Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 10. PROPERTY AND CASUALTY INSURANCE

SUBTITLE D. FIRE INSURANCE AND ALLIED LINES,

INCLUDING RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY INSURANCE

CHAPTER 2008. COVERAGE FOR CERTAIN DAMAGE

TO PROPERTY BUILT WHOLLY OR PARTIALLY OVER WATER

Sec. 2008.001. APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER. This chapter applies only to an insurer described by Section 2251.003(a).

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 1H.002, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 2008.002. COVERAGE; LIMITS AND DEDUCTIBLES. (a) An insurance policy written by an insurer against loss or damage by windstorm, hurricane, or hail may include coverage for:

(1) a building or other structure that is built wholly or partially over water; and

(2) the corporeal movable property contained in a building or structure described by Subdivision (1).

(b) An insurer that writes coverage described by Subsection (a) may impose appropriate limits of coverage and deductibles for the coverage.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 1H.002, eff. April 1, 2009.